tables/de-de-g2.ctb
#the letter n
word nachdem 1345-145
always nächst 1345-12456
always nahm 1345-134
begword nähm 5-1345-134
always natur 1345-2345
always natürlich 1345-456
always neben 1345-12
always nehm 1345-125
word nicht 1345
begmidword nicht 2-1345
always die\sNichte 346-0-1345-3456-236
always nichtig 1345-45
always nichts 1345-234
always nichtsehend 2-1345-234-2356-14-145
always Nichtsportler 2-1345-234-1234-26-2345-123-12456
midendword nis 1346
midendword nisch 1345-24-156
always adonis =
always Garnison 1245-356-1345-24-234-135-1345
#always nisse 1345-24-234-234-15
always Tennis 2345-14-1345-24-234
sufword noch 1345-1456
endword noch 1345-1456
always nommen 1345-1346
always notwendig 1345-2456
word nur 1345-1235
always nutz 1345-1356
always nütz 5-1345-1356

#the letter o
word oder 135
always die\soder 346-0-135-145-12456
always ÖFFENTLICH 246-456
sufword ohne 135-15
begmidword or 26
always moore =

#the letter p
sufword paragraph 1234-1245
endword paragraph 1234-1245
sufword person 1234-1345
endword person 1234-1345
begmidword persön 5-1234-1345
sufword PHILOSOPH 1234-125
endword PHILOSOPH 1234-125
always platz 1234-1356
begmidword Plätz 5-1234-1356
always PLÖTZLICH 1234-456
always POLITIK 1234-13
always POLITISCH 1234-156
begword pro 12345
always punkt 1234-2345
begmidword Pünkt 5-1234-2345

#the letter q
begmidword q 6-12345
endword q 6-12345
begmidword Q 6-12345
endword Q 6-12345

#the letter r
sufword recht 1235-2345
midendword recht 1235-2345
always brecht 12-1235-15-1456-2345
sufword regier 1235-1245
midword regier 1235-1245
always segregieren 234-15-1245-1235-15-1245-346-1235-14
always REHABILIT 1235-12
always REPUBLIK 1235-13
sufword richt 2-3456
midword richt 2-3456
always trichter 2345-1235-3456-2345-12456
sufword RÜCK 1235-46
midword RÜCK 1235-46
always Brücke 12-1235-1256-46-15
always zerdrücken 1356-12456-5-145-46-14

#the letter s
word sag 234-1245
begmidword sag 234-1245
midword säg 234-345-1245
always lasagne =
always sago =
midendword sam 2346
midendword samt 234-1-134-2345
midword samm 234-1-1346
always samen 234-1-134-14
endword einsamen 2346-2346-14
word Einsamen 2346-2346-14
always balsam 12-25-234-1-134
always bisamratte 12-24-234-1-134-1235-1-2345-236
#always blumensamen 12-123-136-134-14-234-1-134-14
sufword Sesam 234-123456-1-134
always satz 234-1356
begmidword sätz 5-234-1356
midendword schaft 156
always barschaft 12-356-156-1-124-2345
always herschaft 1235-1235-156-1-124-2345
always stiefelschaft 23456-346-124-13456-156-1-124-2345
always schlag 156-1245
always schläg 5-156-1245
always schließ 156-2346
word schon 156
always schreib 156-12
always schrieb 2-156-12
always schrift 156-2345
always schwierig 156-45
word sehr 234-1235
midword sehr 234-1235
sufword sein 246
sufword selbst 234-23456
always selbständig 234-13456-12-5-23456-45
always setz 2-15
word sich 14
word sie 234
always sind 234-145
always sitz 2-24
word so 1234
begword sozu  2-1234-2-1356
sufword somit 2-1234-2-2345
sufword sowie 2-1234-2-126
word sodann 2-1234-145-256-1345
word sogleich 2-1234-1245-1456
word sogar 2-1234-1245-1-1235
begword soge 2-1234-12346
word sowieso 2-1234-2-126-2-1234
word wieso 2-126-2-1234
word umso 136-134-2-1234
#always soda =
#always sohn 234-135-125-1345
#always soldat =
#always umsonst 136-134-234-135-1345-23456
#always solch 234-1456
sufword soll 2-234
midword soll 2-234
always sondern 234-1345
always sozial 234-123
always spiel 2-346
always sprach 234-1234
midword spräch 5-234-1234
always sprachecke 234-1234-1235-56-15-46-15
always sprech 2-2346
always staat 23456-2345
always stand 2-23456
always ständ 5-23456
always stell 2-13456
word stets 23456-234

#the letter t
midendword te 236
midendword team =
midendword ten 2345-14
midendword ter 2345-12456
#always holundertee 125-135-123-256-145-12456-2345-15-15
endword tee 2345-15-15
midendword tei 2345-134
always teppich 2345-15-1234-1234-3456
always technik 2345-13
always technisch 2345-156
always teu 2345-126
always trag 2345-1245
begmidword träg 5-2345-1245
always estragon 15-23456-1235-1-1245-135-1345
always treff 2345-124
always trotz 2345-1356

#the letter u
word ÜBER 1256
word über 1256
always über 2-1256
always nasenstüber 1345-1-234-14-23456-1256-12-12456
always trüber 2345-1235-1256-12-12456
word überhaupt 1256-125
always übrig 1256-45
always un 256
word und 136
midword und 2-136
endword ung 136
endword ungen 136-14
midword ungs 136-234
endword schwung 156-2456-256-256-1245
word schwung 156-2456-256-256-1245
word Nibelungen 1345-24-12-13456-256-1245-14
always sprung 234-1234-1235-256-1256
word unter 256
begmidword unter 2-256
endword unter 2-256
always gunter 1245-136-1345-2345-12456
always kunterbunter 13-256-2345-12456-12-256-2345-12456
always munter 134-256-2345-12456

#the letter v
begword ver 36
always veranda 1236-12456-235-145-1
sufword verb 1236-12456-12
word vers 1236-12456-234
endword vers 1236-12456-234
word versmaß 1236-12456-234-134-1-6-2346
word verse 1236-12456-234-15
word versen 1236-12456-234-14
word verses 1236-12456-234-123456
always vertik 1236-12456-2345-24-13
always verhältnis 1236-125
always viel 1236-123
word vielleicht 1236-2345
always volk 1236-13
word voll 12345
begmidword voll 2-12345
endword voll 2-12345
begword völlig 5-12345
always volleyball 1236-135-12345-15-6-13456-12-1-12345
word vom 1236-134
word von 1236
begword von 2-1236
endword von 2-1236
always yvonne 6-13456-1236-135-1345-1345-15
word vor 26
begmidword vor 2-26
always favorit 124-1-1236-26-24-2345
always wahr 2456-125
always Währ 5-2456-125
always Während 345-145
word war 356
word waren 356-14
word wär 5-356
word wären 5-356-14
word wärst 5-356-23456
word wäre 5-356-15
word wars 2456-356-234
#word wart 2456-356-2345
#word wärter 2456-345-1235-2345-12456
midendword wärts 2456
word was 2456
always weg 2456-1245
always weis 2-146
always zweispurig 1356-2456-146-234-1234-136-1235-45
always weit 2456-2345
always zweite 1356-2456-146-236
always zweitwohnung 1356-2456-146-2345-2456-135-125-1345-136
always welch 13456
always wenig 2456-45
always wenn 2456-1345
begmidword werd 2-2456
always beschwerd 23-156-2456-12456-145
always wesentlich 2456-456
word wie 126
begmidword wie 2-126
endword wie 2-126
word wies 2456-346-234
always wiesel 2456-346-234-15-123
always wieder 346-145
sufword will 2456-12345
midword will 2456-12345
always schwillt 156-2456-24-12345-2345
always willy 2456-24-12345-6-13456
always willi 2456-24-12345-24
word wir 2456-1235
word wird 2456-145
always wirk 2456-13
word wirst 2456-23456
always wirtschaft 2456-156
always wiss 2456-234
always wohl 2456-123
begmidword woll 2-135
#midword woll 2-135
midword wöll 5-135
always geschwollen 12346-156-2456-135-12345-14
word worden 2456-14
begword wurd 136
#sufword Würde 1256-15
sufword würde 1256-15
sufword würden 1256-14
#always gewürdigt 12346-2456-1256-1235-145-45-2345
#always unwürdig 256-2456-1256-1235-145-45
#always würdig 2456-1256-1235-145-45

#the letter x
begmidword x 6-1346
endword x 6-1346
begmidword X 6-1346
endword X 6-1346

#the letter y
begmidword y 6-13456
endword y 6-13456
begmidword Y 6-13456
endword Y 6-13456

#the letter z
always zahl 1356-123
begmidword zähl 5-1356-123
always zeit 1356-2345
always prophezeit 12345-1234-125-15-1356-146-2345
word zu 1356
begmidword zu 2-1356
endword zu 2-1356
#always zuber 1356-136-12-12456
always zug 1356-136-1245
always zuge 2-1356-12346
always zugent 1356-136-1245-14-2345
always zugabe 2-1356-1245-1-12-15
always zugaben 2-1356-1245-1-12-14
midendword zuges 1356-136-1245-123456
begword zugreif 2-1356-1245-1235-146-124
begword zugrif 2-1356-1245-1235-24-124
word zugleich 2-1356-1245-1456
word zugegen 2-1356-2-1245
always zugang 2-1356-1245-235-1245
begmidword zugäng 2-1356-345-1345-1245
always zungen 1356-256-1245-14
always zunge 1356-256-12346
always zung 1356-136
word zum 1356-134
word zunächst 1356-1345
word zur 1356-1235
sufword zurück 1356-46
always zusammen 1356-234
always zwischen 1356-2456


# Système International Prefixes
begword yotta 6-13456-135-2345-2345-1 10^24
begword zetta 1356-15-2345-2345-1 10^21
begword exa 1346-1 10^18
begword peta 1234-15-2345-1 10^15
begword tera 2345-12456-1 10^12
begword giga 1245-24-1245-1 10^9
begword mega 134-15-1245-1 10^6
begword kilo 13-24-123-135 10^3
begword hekto 125-15-13-2345-135 10^2
begword deka 145-15-13-1 10^1
begword dezi 145-15-1356-24 10^-1
begword zenti 1356-14-2345-24 10^-2
begword milli 134-24-123-123-24 10^-3
begword mikro 134-24-13-1235-135 10^-6
begword nano 1345-235-135 10^-9
begword piko 1234-24-13-135 10^-12
begword femto 124-12356-2345-135 10^-15
begword atto 1-2345-2345-135 10^-18
begword zepto 1356-15-1234-2345-135 10^-21
begword yocto 6-13456-135-6-14-2345-135 10^-24


#have changed the way C Q X and Y are explained
